n11.dix
<pardef n="akk/a_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>anu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxiru</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anannu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxirannu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aniMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxiriMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anigeV</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>anigAgi</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>anigoskara</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxirigeV</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>aMxirigAgi</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>aMxirigoskara</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ana deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxira deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aniMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxiriMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ana</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxira</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>analli</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxiralli</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>A</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxireV</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aNN/a_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>anu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxiru</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anannu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxirannu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aniMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxiriMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anigeV</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>anigAgi</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>anigoskara</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxirigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>aMxirigAgi</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>aMxirigoskara</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ana deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxira deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aniMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxiriMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ana</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxira</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>analli</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aMxiralli</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>A</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aMxire</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="akka"><i>akk</i><par n="akk/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="amma"><i>amm</i><par n="akk/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="avveVvva"><i>avveVvv</i><par n="akk/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="aNNa"><i>aNN</i><par n="aNN/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="appa"><i>app</i><par n="aNN/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="wamma"><i>wamm</i><par n="aNN/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="ayya"><i>ayy</i><par n="aNN/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="SiRya"><i>SiRy</i><par n="aNN/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="ajja"><i>ajj</i><par n="aNN/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAva"><i>mAv</i><par n="aNN/a_n"/></e>
